Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 7

Loans

45-3-701. Real estate loans.

Original Real Estate Loans. Subject to this chapter and to rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner, every association has the power to originate real estate loans of the following types:

Real estate loans on real estate that constitutes home property or primarily residential property and upon which has been constructed an existing and completed home or homes or other structure or structures designed or used primarily for residential purposes; provided, that the amount of the loans shall not exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the value of the real estate security for the loans, or another percentage that the commissioner may prescribe;

Real estate loans to finance the acquisition and development of real estate as home property or primarily residential property; provided, that the amount of the loan shall not exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the value of the real estate security for the loans, or another percentage that the commissioner may prescribe, as of the completion of the development of the real estate into building lots or sites ready for construction;

Real estate loans to finance the construction of a home or homes or other structure or structures designed or used primarily for residential purposes on real estate that constitutes home property or primarily residential property, which loans may be inclusive or exclusive of loans to finance the acquisition and development of the real estate; provided, that the amount of the loan shall not exceed eighty percent (80%) of the value of the real estate security for the loans as of the completion of the construction of the homes or other structures, or other percentage that the commissioner may prescribe; and

Real estate loans on other improved real estate; provided, that the amount of the loan shall not exceed eighty percent (80%) of the value of the real estate security for the loans, or another percentage that the commissioner may prescribe.

Restrictions on Real Estate Loans. No association shall make a real estate loan to one (1) borrower if the sum of the amount of the loan and the total balance of all outstanding real estate loans owed to the association by the borrower exceeds an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of the association’s deposit liability, or an amount equal to the sum of the association’s net worth, whichever amount is less.

Methods or Plans of Repayment and Variations in Interest.

An association shall agree in writing with its borrowers as to the method or plan by which indebtedness shall be repaid. Repayments may be, but are not required to be, in level periodic installments. The agreements may provide for variations in the interest rates payable in connection with the indebtedness; provided, that the variations are in proportion to variations in the weighted average cost of savings, borrowings, and Federal Home Loan Bank advances as to Tennessee members of the Federal Home Loan Bank of Cincinnati as computed from statistics tabulated by the Federal Home Loan Bank of Cincinnati, or in proportion to another standard that the commissioner may approve. Where the term of a loan is for no more than three (3) years, and the loan is not set up with a monthly amortization, then the association and its borrower may agree in writing to utilize any other index for the variations.

An association, in exercising its rights pursuant to a variable interest rate clause, may:

Change the amount of the periodic installment payments of an amortized loan;

Reduce or extend the maturity date; or

A combination of both subdivisions (c)(2)(A)(i) and (ii).

An association, at least thirty (30) days prior to the effective date of any change pursuant to subdivision (c)(2)(A), shall notify the borrower in writing of the change and its effects on the amount of periodic installment payments and/or on the maturity date of the installments. Notice shall be deemed given when it is deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the persons personally liable to pay the indebtedness, as those persons' names and addresses appear on the association's records at the time of the giving of notice.

Power to Deal in Real Estate Loans. Every association may purchase real estate loans upon security of the same character and amount against which an association may make an original loan.

Participation in Real Estate Loans. Every association may participate with other lenders in real estate loans, whether by purchase, sale or joint origination, of any type that the association could originate.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.24; T.C.A., § 45-1424; Acts 1981, ch. 115, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of functions under this chapter from the department of commerce and insurance to the department of financial institutions, see Executive Order No. 38 (February 11, 1983).

Cross-References. Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 66; 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, § 13.

45-3-702. Insured or guaranteed loans.

Every association may make, without regard to any loan limitations or restrictions otherwise imposed by this chapter, but nevertheless subject to any rules or regulations of the commissioner, any loan, secured or unsecured, that is insured or guaranteed in any manner and in any amount by the United States or any instrumentality thereof.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.25; T.C.A., § 45-1425.

45-3-703. Other loans.

Loans Secured by Deposit Accounts or Capital Stock. Every association has the power to make loans secured by deposit accounts with the association to the extent of the withdrawal value thereof. Unless approved in writing by the commissioner, no association shall make a loan to any person if the loan is secured in whole or in part by issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of any kind or class of the association.

Improvement Loans. Every association has the power to make property improvement loans made pursuant to any title of the National Housing Act, as the act may be amended from time to time, and to make other loans, secured or unsecured, to homeowners and other property owners for the maintenance, repair, alteration, modernization, landscaping, improvement, including new construction, furnishing or equipping of their properties, subject to limitations, terms, and conditions that may be established by rules and regulations of the commissioner.

Mobile Home Loans. Every association has the power to make loans made for the purpose of mobile home financing, subject to limitations and conditions prescribed by the commissioner, including, but not limited to, any limitations as to the maximum amount of all the loans by each association.

Loans Secured by Loans. Every association has the power to make loans secured by the pledge of loans or investments of a type in which the association is authorized to invest; provided, that the loans or investments so pledged shall be subject to all requirements that would be applicable were the association to originate the loans or investments.

Other Loans. Every association has the power to invest in other loans not specifically referred to in this section if the powers are granted to federal associations in Tennessee, in the manner that the commissioner may by rule permit.

Participation — Power to Hold and Sell Loans. The power granted to every association to make loans pursuant to this chapter also includes the power to participate with other lenders in the making of the loans, and includes the power to hold and sell the loans at the times and upon the terms and conditions that the board of directors of each association determines.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.26; T.C.A., § 45-1426.

45-3-704. Construction lenders liability.

An association that makes a loan, the proceeds of which are used or may be used by the borrower to finance the design, manufacture, construction, repair, modification, or improvement of real property for sale or lease to others, shall not be held liable to third persons for any loss or damage occasioned by any defect in the real property so designed, manufactured, constructed, repaired, modified, or improved, or for any loss or damage resulting from the failure of the borrower to use due care in the design, manufacture, construction, repair, modification, or improvement of the real property, unless the loss or damage is a result of an act of the association outside the scope of the activities of a lender of money that is tantamount to assuming direct and active responsibility for, or assuring the structural integrity of, the design, manufacture, construction, repair, modification, or improvement of the property or unless the association has been a party to misrepresentation with respect to the real property.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.27; T.C.A., § 45-1427.

45-3-705. Installment loans and loans for purchase of mobile homes — Interest and charges — Statement of transaction.

As to home improvement installment loans or loans for the purchase of mobile homes or other installment loans that associations now or hereafter have the power to make, with repayment in equal, or substantially equal, monthly or other periodic installments over the term of the loan subdivisions (1)-(3) shall apply:

Interest computed on the principal amount of the loan for the entire term of the loan at a rate not to exceed six percent (6%) per annum may be either deducted in advance or added to the principal; or in the alternative, interest may be determined and charged in accordance with the actuarial method; provided, that in any event, that the maximum effective rate of interest on the loan shall not exceed eighteen percent (18%) per annum; and provided further, that if the unpaid balance of the loan is either paid or renewed prior to its maturity date, the borrower or other person paying or renewing the loan shall be refunded or credited with unearned interest in an amount that represents at least as great a proportion of the original charge as the sum of the periodical time balances after the date of prepayment bears to the sum of all the periodical time balances under the schedule of payments in the original installment loan; provided, that associations shall not be required to refund or credit any unearned interest where it would result in less than the minimum charge provided in subdivision (2)(E) nor to make a refund or credit where the amount thereof would be less than one dollar ($1.00) for each loan;

When interest is charged as provided in subdivision (1), associations shall not make additional charges, either directly or indirectly, except for the following, which charges when so made and collected shall not be deemed interest for any purpose of law:

Delinquency charges not to exceed five percent (5%) of any one (1) installment more than fifteen (15) days in arrears;

Premiums for insurance required or obtained as security for or by reason of the installment loan;

Fees and taxes paid to public officials for filing, recording or releasing any instrument or lien;

Reasonable expenses of investigating title or titles to real property securing the loans, if any, including the cost of title insurance and costs of closing the loan;

Reimbursement of necessary expenses incurred in securing and collecting the loan, not to exceed four percent (4%) of the gross amount of the loan. The cost of legal process or proceedings and reasonable attorneys' fees may be charges in addition to the above; provided, that any association may make a minimum charge on each loan for interest and charges made pursuant to this subdivision (2)(E) of ten dollars ($10.00) per loan or one dollar ($1.00) per monthly installment, whichever is greater;

When an installment loan is made and interest is charged as provided in subdivision (1), any association shall, at the time of closing the loan, provide the borrower with a written statement of the transaction or a copy of the note containing the following information:

The original principal amount of the loan;

The insurance premium for each type of coverage provided;

The amount of fees and taxes paid or to be paid public officials, if any;

The total amount of interest and all charges made at or prior to closing pursuant to subdivision (2)(E) and the approximate rate expressed in dollars per one hundred dollars ($100) per year;

Other charges, if any;

The amount of unpaid balance; and

The number, amount and due dates of installment payments scheduled to repay the indebtedness.

Acts 1968, ch. 590, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 227, § 1; 1974, ch. 698, § 5; T.C.A., § 45-1413; Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 6.01; 1979, ch. 206, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 45-1437, 45-3-513; Acts 1981, ch. 210, §§ 1-3.

Cross-References. Manufactured homes and recreational vehicles, title 68, ch. 126.

45-3-706. Insurance protection for home improvement installment loans.

An association in making an installment loan in excess of three hundred dollars ($300) may require a borrower to insure tangible personal property offered as security for the loan against any substantial risk of loss, damage or destruction for any amount not to exceed the actual value of the property or the approximate amount of the loan, whichever is lesser, and for a term and upon conditions that are reasonable and appropriate considering the nature of the property and maturity and other circumstances of the loan; provided, that the insurance is sold by a licensed agent, broker or solicitor, and the borrower may furnish the borrower's own insurance policy.

The association may also request as security for any loan obligation in excess of three hundred dollars ($300) insurance on the life of the borrower or one (1) of them, if there are two (2) or more. The initial amount of credit life insurance shall not exceed the total amount repayable under the total amount of the indebtedness. Not more than one (1) policy of life insurance may be written in connection with any installment loan transaction unless requested by the borrower, comaker or endorser.

In accepting any insurance provided for in this section as security for a loan, the association may deduct the premiums for the insurance from the proceeds of the loan, and remit the premiums to the insurance company writing the insurance and any gain or advantage to the association or any employee, officer, director, agent, affiliate, or associate from the insurance or its sale shall not be considered an additional or further charge or interest in connection with any loan made hereunder.

Every insurance policy or certificate written in connection with a loan transaction pursuant to of this section shall provide for cancellation of coverage and a refund of the premium unearned upon the discharge of the loan obligation for which the insurance is security without prejudice to any claim existing at the time of discharge. Whenever insurance is written in connection with a loan transaction, the association shall deliver, or cause to be delivered, to the borrower a policy, certificate or other memorandum that shows the coverages and the costs of coverage, if any, to the borrower within thirty (30) days from the date of the loan.

Acts 1968, ch. 590, § 2; 1974, ch. 698, § 5; T.C.A., § 45-1414; Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 6.01; T.C.A., §§ 45-1438, 45-3-514.

45-3-707. Department to service loans — Service charge.

Associations are authorized, directed, and required to provide for and maintain a department to service the loans and properties securing the loans, including among other things:

Services in reference to investigating the financial standing of applicants for loans;

The enforcement of all contractual requirements of borrowers, including insurance, maintenance, repairs, delinquencies, defaults, and continuing security; and

Taxes, assessments and other governmental levies;

In their contracts with borrowers, the associations are authorized to provide for and collect a service fee, the amount of which shall in no event exceed two and one-half percent (2½%) per annum of the unpaid balance of the loan, to be used in defraying the expense of providing and maintaining the service department, including the portion of the association's overhead expense that is fairly incurred by and in connection with the maintenance of the department; provided, that the service fee shall be in addition to legal interest and the actual expenses incurred in making, securing, and closing the loan, and shall not be collected as interest or compensation for the use of the money loaned, but shall be used in defraying the expense of maintaining the department and in servicing the loans, as contemplated herein; and provided further, that the service fee shall not be collected from borrowers who make deposit account loans.

The service fee may be made payable in periodic installments running throughout the life of the loan or at the initial closing of the loan. Any service charge collected at the time the loan is closed may be retained regardless of when the loan is paid.

The service fee payable in periodic installments may be retained in the following manner:

If the loan is paid within one (1) year from the date same is made, the service fee may be retained or collected for the full year; or

Where the loan is paid after the period of one (1) year, the service fee shall be retained or collected only to the date of payment.

It is the duty of the commissioner, at the time of making annual examinations of associations making real estate loans, to determine whether associations making real estate loans, as herein authorized, are charging fees in excess of the amount reasonably required to defray the expense of servicing loans and in maintaining the service department contemplated herein; and, in the event it is found that the provisions herein are being violated, it shall be the duty of the commissioner to take necessary action, under the law, to prevent the associations from continuing the illegal acts.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.30; T.C.A., § 45-1430.